Massachusetts, session 194th, H5284.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (n) of section 89 of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second
paragraph the following paragraph:-
Subject to regulations promulgated by the board, commonwealth charter schools may
voluntarily offer enrollment preferences to certain high needs students, including, but not limited
to, low income or economically disadvantaged students, English learners or former English
learners, or students with disabilities, and may enroll said students at any time during the school
year. Said enrollment preferences shall apply both to students who are admitted through the
lottery and students admitted off of the waitlist pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2. The board of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate rules
and regulations to implement the provisions of this act. At a minimum, such regulations shall
define the specific student subgroups that will be eligible for enrollment preferences authorized
under Section 1, and the process for implementing said enrollment preferences; provided that
of 2

students experiencing homelessness and students who have been identified as Students with
Emergency Resettlement Status may be included in the list of specific student subgroups that
will be eligible for said enrollment preferences.
of 2